Tennessee, session 114, HB0345.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-15-203(e), is amended by
inserting the language "the chairs of the judiciary committee of the senate and the committee of
the house of representatives with jurisdiction over criminal justice-related matters," after "the
speaker of the house of representatives".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0345
002061
- 1 -